Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2949.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-11-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-11 entitled "Suspension
or Revocation of Licenses — Violations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-11-7. Authority of division of motor vehicles to suspend license.
(a)(1) The division of motor vehicles is authorized to suspend the license of an operator or
chauffeur without preliminary hearing upon a showing by its records or other sufficient evidence
that the licensee:
(i) Has been adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction to have:
(A) Committed an offense for which mandatory revocation or suspension of license is
required upon conviction or adjudication;
(B) Committed with such frequency of offenses against traffic regulations governing the
movement of vehicles as to indicate a disrespect for traffic laws and a disregard for the safety of
other persons on the highways;
(C) Been a reckless or negligent driver of a motor vehicle;
(D) Permitted an unlawful or fraudulent use of a license;
(E) Committed an offense in another state which, if committed in this state, would be
grounds for suspension or revocation;
(F) Committed any offense enumerated in § 31-9-1; or
(ii) Is the subject of an order issued pursuant to § 14-1-67; or.

(iii) Poses an imminent safety risk to the general public as determined by the application
of objectively ascertainable standards.
(2) Except for paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection, the suspension shall be for any length
of time, not exceeding one year, that the division of motor vehicles shall determine is necessary in
order to protect public safety based upon its findings of the circumstances under which the offense
was committed, the likelihood of recurrence, and the deterrent effect that might reasonably be
expected to result from the hardship a suspension or prospective suspension would entail. Any
license suspended suspension pursuant to paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection subsection (a) of this
section shall be for the length of time set forth in the court order and shall run concurrently with
any current suspension period unless otherwise specified.
(b) Upon suspending the license of any person as authorized by subsection (a) of this
section, the division of motor vehicles shall immediately notify the licensee in writing of the factual
and legal basis for the suspension, the procedure for requesting a hearing, and the rights afforded
the individual pursuant to subsections (d) — (f) of this section. When physical or mental fitness is
the basis for the suspension determination, the notice shall reference the specific functional
standard promulgated pursuant to § 31-10-44(b), which was relied upon by the division of motor
vehicles. Upon his or her request the division of motor vehicles shall afford the licensee an
opportunity for a hearing as early as practical and no later than twenty (20) days after receipt of the
request. An order from a judge or magistrate pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be
binding upon the division of motor vehicles, and the division is prohibited from further suspension
on the same matter.
(c) Notwithstanding the court’s ability to order an ignition interlock system pursuant to §
31-27-2.8, the division of motor vehicles shall impose a hardship license and/or an ignition
interlock system in lieu of license suspension for offenses which, if committed in Rhode Island,
would result in suspension of license.
(c)(d) Except as authorized in subsection (a)(1) of this section, whenever the division of
motor vehicles proposes to suspend the license of any person, the division of motor vehicles shall
afford a hearing to the licensee prior to suspending the person’s license. When a licensee requests
a hearing, no No action to suspend his or her a license shall be taken until a hearing decision has
been rendered in accordance with subsections (d) — (f) (e) through (g) of this section. The division
of motor vehicles shall notify the licensee in writing of the factual and legal basis for the proposed
suspension, the procedure for requesting right to a hearing, and the additional rights afforded the
individual pursuant to subsections (d) — (f) (e) through (g) of this section. When physical or mental
fitness is the basis for the suspension recommendation, the notice shall reference the specific
LC005840 - Page 2 of 5

functional standard promulgated pursuant to § 31-10-44(b), which was relied upon by the division
of motor vehicles. The division of motor vehicles shall afford the licensee an opportunity for a
hearing as early as practical and no later than twenty (20) days after notice is issued.
(d)(e) The division of motor vehicles shall ensure that the hearing procedures afforded
pursuant to subsection (b) and (c) (d) of this section provide for:
(1) an An in person hearing before an impartial decision-maker;
(2) the The opportunity to compel the production of documents and witnesses, including
members of the division of motor vehicles ’s Medical Advisory Board;
(3) the The opportunity to confront and cross-examine witnesses;
(4) access Access to all of the evidence upon which the division of motor vehicles relied
in making its determination to suspend; and
(5) the The right to present any and all relevant evidence including the right to obtain and
present the results of a recently administered road test. During any hearing, the division of motor
vehicles shall bear the burden of proof as to the existence of the grounds for the suspension. The
division of motor vehicles shall further ensure that during a hearing to determine the physical or
mental fitness of a licensee, proof of the lack of physical or mental fitness shall be by clear and
convincing evidence. The presumption of inability to operate a motor vehicle with safety
established by the functional standards promulgated pursuant to § 31-10-44(b), shall be rebuttable
by evidence that notwithstanding an individual’s functional limitation, he or she is able to safely
operate a motor vehicle.
(e)(f) For the purpose of the hearing procedures described in subsection (d)(e) of this
section, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles or his or her the administrator's duly
authorized agent may administer oaths and may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses
and the production of relevant books and papers, and may require a reexamination of the licensee.
(f)(g) After the hearing conducted pursuant to subsection (d)(e) of this section, the division
of motor vehicles shall issue a written decision based solely on the evidence adduced at the hearing
and containing the legal and factual basis for the determination. The division of motor vehicles may
either rescind its order of suspension, determine suspension is not warranted; may continue,
modify, or extend the suspension of the license; or may revoke the license.
(h) Any licensee aggrieved by a decision of the division of motor vehicles may appeal the
decision to the sixth division district court pursuant to § 31-2-19. Any suspension of license issued
by the division of motor vehicles shall be stayed until an appeal is heard by the sixth division district
court.
SECTION 2. Section 31-2-19 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-2 entitled "Division of
LC005840 - Page 3 of 5

Motor Vehicles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-2-19. Appeal from administrator of the division of motor vehicles.
Any person aggrieved by any order of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles
may appeal the order to the sixth division district court by filing, within ten (10) days from the date
of the notice to such person of the issuance of the order appealed from, a petition in said court
stating the grounds upon which the appeal is taken. Upon the filing of such petition and tendering
a twenty-five dollar ($25.00) filing fee, the court shall give thirty (30) days’ notice of the pendency
of the petition to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles by serving the administrator of
the division of motor vehicles, in the manner in which subpoenas in equity are served, with a
certified copy of the petition and the petition shall follow the course of equity so far as it is
applicable. Upon hearing the petition, the court may review the evidence taken at a hearing or
investigator’s reports, or other information upon which the administrator’s action was taken, and
may in its discretion, affirm, overrule, or modify the order of the administrator of the division of
motor vehicles. The taking of such appeal shall not operate as a stay of the order of the administrator
of the division of motor vehicles from which appeal is taken, and such order shall remain in full
force and effect during the pendency of the appeal, except for the provisions set forth in § 31-11-7.
A party aggrieved by a final order of the court may seek appellate review pursuant to the procedures
set forth in § 42-35-15.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005840
========
LC005840 - Page 4 of 5